ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/de_DE/1996/hyph_de_DE.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.arbei3te
.ar1b
.ar1bei
.ar2s
.ar1me
.an1o
.an1e
.ang2
.an1k
.an1s
.an3z
.a1b1a
.ab1r
.a1b1i
.ab1l
.a1b1u
.ae1
.al3les
.al1le
.al3t2e.
.al1te
.au2s1
.a2u1t
.auto3re
.au1to
.au2f1
.ach3te
.ach4tes
.ah1l
.ak1t
.as1t
.r2
.rann1
.ra1te
.ro2c
.ro2h
.roh3em
.ro1he
.ro3t2e.
.roma3ne
.ro1ma
.rä3c
.ren3te
.re2nt
.rei3n2e.
.rei3che
.rei3st
.reu3te
.re2u2t
.rech3t2e.
.rech3ter
.rin3ne
.rich3te
.ru3fe
.1ruf
.rü1b
.rüt4telt
.rüt1te
.rüt3tel
.o2
.ori1
.or1c
.ob1r
.o4st
.os1tr2
.os3ten
.offe3nen
.of1fe
.nann1
.n2a2c
.natio3ne
.1na1ti
.nati1o
.nation2
.nor1m
.nie3r
.nich3t2e.
.1ni1s
.bau1s
.1ba
.bau3te
.ba2ut
.ba2ch
.bah3ne
.bah2n
.brann3
.brauch3te
.brach3t
.bo1te
.1bo
.bä1re
.bän1di3
.bän1
.bä2nd
.be1ra
.ber1s
.be1na
.be1ne
.bei3ne
.1bei
.begün1sti3
.1be1g
.be1gü
.bekann3ter
.be1ka
.b2e3te
.1bet
.bezo1ge3ne
.1be1z
.be1zo
.bezo1g
.beque3men
.be1q
.bequ2
.beque2m
.beque1me
.bil3der
.1bi
.bil1de
.bü4r2o.
.1bü
.bü1ro
.ä2
.äl1
.äch1
.äs1
.äm1
.d2
.dach4t
.1da
.da2ch
.da1t
.drück3ten
.drüc2k
.de3rer
.1der
.1de1ne
.1de1st
.demons3
.de1mo
.din3ge
.1di
.dien3st2e.
.die2n2s
.dien3sten
.di3e2s.
.die3se
.dich3te
.d4sc
.e2
.er1ra1
.er1o1b
.ern1t
.er3b2l
.er1b
.er2d1a
.er1e
.e1r1i
.ergan2
.er1g
.er1ga
.er1k
.er2sto
.er3ste
.er4st2e.
.ermäch1ti3
.er1m
.er1mä
.erwi3s
.er1w
.erfol4
.er1fo
.en3d2e.
.e2nd
.en4d3er
.en3den
.en1e
.e2n2t
.ent3ei
.ebe3ne
.e1be
.ei3n2e.
.eini3g2e.
.ei1ni
.ei1nig
.eini3gen
.ei1le
.ei3che
.e1la2
.el3d
.elen2
.el1le
.el1t
.eu3
.e1k1l
.es1te
.em2d
.ex1a
.ex1em
.exi3
.i2
.iri3scher
.i1ri
.iris4ch
.iri3schen
.i1o1
.in1
.in3dus3
.i2nd
.in1du
.in3g
.i1ko1
.is1c
.lan3de2s.
.1la2nd
.lau3t2e.
.la2ut
.lach4
.lam2m
.lo3se
.le2n1d
.len3z
.lei4st
.leis3tun3ge
.lei1stu
.legen3de
.le1ge
.le1ge2nd
.lini3en
.li1ni
.li2d
.li1en
.liegen3de
.lie1ge
.lie1ge2nd
.lich3ter
.li3ste
.1list
.li1v
.lun1g
.1lun
.u2
.ur1
.un1e
.un1g
.un3sc
.un1st
.ul1
.um1
.g2
.gren3ze
.gerech3t2e.
.ge1rec
.gerun3
.ge1r2u
.ger1s
.ge1n
.1geb2
.gebie3t2e.
.ge1bi
.gebi2ete
.gei3ster.
.1gei
.gei3stern
.gei4s3ti2g.
.gei1s4tig
.ge1lun3
.1gel
.ge1lu
.ge3sc
.gestal3te
.ge1st4
.ge1stal
.gefan1ge3ne
.1gef
.ge1fa
.gefan3ge
.gläubi3g2e.
.1glä
.gläu1bi
.gläu3big
.guns3te
.1gu
.gu3t2e.
.g2ut
.gün4s
.1gü
.ha2r
.handlun3ge
.ha2nd
.han2d1l
.hand1lun
.halb3en
.hal1be
.hälf1
.hei3de
.heili3g2e.
.hei1li
.hei1lig
.heili4gen
.hei3s
.hu1re1
.hunde2r3te
.hun1de
.hu2nd
.hun1der
.hun3dert
.höri3g2e.
.hö1ri
.ü2
.ü3bun3ge
.1ü1bu
.k2
.kann3t
.1ka
.kan3te
.ka1le
.kommen3de
.1ko
.kom1me
.komme2nd
.ki1c
.ki1st
.kla3r2e.
.kla3ren
.kur3s2e.
.kur2se
.künfti3gen
.1kü
.künf1t
.kü2nf
.künf1ti
.s2
.sa1me
.1sam
.sor1
.1so
.sen3de
.1se
.se2nd
.sequen3
.se1q
.sequ2
.si1g
.1si
.su3che
.1su
.3suc
.such4
.sch2
.schen3ke
.schei3d
.s2chei
.schli3che
.2sch1lic
.s2chl
.schwe2r3te
.staa3ten
.1staa
.star2k
.stan3de
.1stan
.sta2nd
.streng3t
.str2
.st4e
.studi3en
.1stu
.stu1d
.stu1di
.spiel3ten
.sp2
.1spi
.spu3re
.s1pu
.sys3te3me
.t2
.tan1t
.ta1b
.ta3ler
.ta3ge2s
.1tag
.ta1ge
.ta1te
.trau3t2e.
.tr2
.tra2ut
.trach3te
.trie4
.to1ma3
.täti3ge
.tä1ti
.3te3ste
.1test
.tie2f
.ti3sche
.tis4ch
.ti3m2e.
.t4sc
.2ts
.twi3
.t1w
.1ty1
.ma1le
.1ma
.3mal
.mobi3le
.1mo
.mo1bi
.moder3ne
.3mo1d
.mo1der
.mäßi3ge
.1mäß
.mä1ßi
.meinun3ge
.mei1nung
.mi1ne
.1mi
.mi1ni1
.mi3sche
.mis4ch
.mi1st
.mi2t
.vol3ler
.1vo
.vie2
.1vi
.wah2l1
.1wah
.we2r3te
.willi3ge
.wil1li
.wil1lig
.wich1
.wi2s
.wi3sche
.wi1sc
.wis4ch
.wu2ss1
.würdi3gen
.wür1di
.1wüh1
.p2
.paa3ren
.1paa
.por1ti3
.po4c
.pel1
.zah3le
.1zah
.zehn3
.1ze
.zep1
.zi3g
.1zi
.zun1g
.1zu
.züchti3gen
.1zü
.züch1ti
.farbi3g2e.
.1fa
.far1b
.far1bi
.far3big
.fah4ren
.fah1re
.fa3hre2n.
.fak1t
.frei3en
.fri3ste
.for3men
.1fo
.fe1ri1
.1fe
.ferti3gen
.fer1ti
.fen1
.fel2d3er
.3fe2l
.fel2d
.fes3t2e.
.fi3sche
.1fi
.fis4ch
.fluch3te
.f2lu
.fuh3re
.1fu
.ö2d
.ös1te
.jah3re
.1j
2a.
a1an
a1a1b
aa1le
aa1c
a2a1t2e.
aa2ts1
ar1anz
a1ra3d
ar1all
a1rag
a1rac
arak1
a1ras
a1rat
ara3ten
a1raf
arrei1
ar1re
arri1e
ar1ri
a1ro1ni1
ar2on
ar1o1d
a1rol
ar2bl
ar1b
ar2b3s
a1rä
a1rei
a2rek
a1ret
2a1ri
arin1n
arin3g
ari3er.
ari1en
ari1e1s
ar2les
ar1l
arli1
a1ru
ar3ge
ar1g
ar2gl
ar1c
3archi3schen
archis4ch
a3rü3ber.
arübe2
arüber1
ar2ker
ar1ke
ar2schr2
ar1sc
ar2s2chm
a2r1te
ar1tu
art1he
ar2mi
ar3fe
ar4f2e.
a1o
ao1i
a3os
ao1te
an1ar1c
anas2
an1ne
an2ne2s
an1äs
and1rü
a2nd
an2d2d2
an1d2e.
4ander.
an1der
3an3derr
3an3der1g
3anderset1ze
an3ders
ander1se
ander3set
3ande2rz
an1den
an2d3eng
an1dem
an1er1g
anei2
anein3
an1em
a1ni
a2n1is1l
a1nis
ani3sti
1an1l
a1nu
an2g1ar
an1ga
an1ge
ange3re
an1ger
ange3ner
an1gene
angehö1ri3
an1geh
ange1hö
an1g1li
angs1a3mt
ang1sam
an1ch
ank1te
an3se
an3s1g
an3sc
ansch3w
an1sh
an1s1kr
an1st
an1s1z
an2tar
an1ta
an1ta3g
antes1
an1tho
1anwä
an1w
2an2z.
1an3zei
an1ze
anzi3el
an3zi
anz1w
anfer1ti3
a2nf
an1fe
anf4t
a1nö
ab1ra
1ab1re
ab1ru
1abbr
ab1b
ab1ä
1a2b1d
abe2r
a2bes
ab1ir
a1bi
abi2le
abi3l2e.
ab1la
ab1lä
ab1lö
a2b1s
1ab1ze
ab1z
1ab1zu
a1ä
a2d1ap
a1da
ad1op
a1de
a2des
adi1gt
a1di
ad1st
a1el
ae1li2
ai1ro
ai1g
ai1ke
ai1sc
ai1t
a1iv
ai1v2e.
al1ang
al1ab
al1au
a1l1ak
al1am
a1lo
a1lä1
al1de
a1l1er1b
al1er1t
a1led
a1lee
a2l1el
a1lek
a1l1ef
ale1x
a1li
al1le
alle2n2d
alle3ner
al1lene
al2le2m.
al1gr
a2l1c
alk1s
a2lk
al2sc
a2ls
al1st
al2stü2
al1tra
altr2
al1to
al1te
al2t2e.
al2tes
alti3gt
al1ti
al1me
a1ly
au1a
au1r
au1ne
au2nes
aun3s
aun2t2e.
aun1t
aub1l
aue3rei
au1er
au1en
au1e2m
au1i
au2l2e.
au1le
auli3chen
au1li
au3ge
au1che
auh1r
au2s3au
au1sa
2au1so
au2s1s
aus1tr2
au1ta
a2ut
au2t1s
au2f1a
1aufr
au2fo
1auf1n
aufe3ne
au1fe
1auf3zu
auf1z
ag1ar
a1ga
ag1an
a2g1au
ag2n
a1ge
agel2t
a1gel
age2s
age3sc
age3st4
a2gem
a2ge1v
agi3er.
a1gi
ag1l
a3gu
ag1sa
ag2sti
a1gö
a1gy
a1ce
ach1au
ach1ra
achr2
a1chro
ach1re
ach1n
a1che
a3che3res
achere2
a3chen
a2ch1ei
a1chi
a2ch1l
a1chu
ach3tes
a2ch3m
ach1w
a2cke2nt
ac2k
a1cke
ah1au
ah1re
ahr3ern
ah1rer
ahre2n3d
ah1os
ahn1a
ah1n2e.
ah3ner
ah1nu
ahn1s
a1he
ahe1s
a1hi
ahier4
ah3le2n2d
ah1li
ah1me
ak1n
a1ke
a1ki
ak1le
ak1tes
akt1h
1ak1z
a4sches
as1k
ast1au
a1s2te
a1sti
as3ti3schen
astis4ch
as3ti3sches
as1mu2
as1m
as1p2
a1sy
a1ta
at1ar2
a1tr2
a1to
a2t1ort
2at2e.
a1ter
ater3ne
a1ten1b
a1te2nd
a3te2ns
a1ten1p2
a1te2n3f
a2t1eig
a1tel
a1teu
a1tec
a1tet2
ate3t2e.
at2ete
a1te1v
a1ti
at1in1t
atli3
a2t1l
a1tu
at2c
at1hil
a1tü
at2se
a2ts
at3s2chl
at1s1hi
at2stä
ats1pr
atsp2
a2tt
at1tr2
at2t1s
atz1w
aman3te
a1ma
ama3g
ama1h
a1mo2
am1bi1
am1b
amen3ten
a1me2nt
2ams
amt1a
am1ten
amt1h
am2m2e.
am1me
amme2n3d
am4mes
a1v
ave3r2e
ave2r1
avi1en
a1vi
a1w
a1pa
apo1s
a1pe
a1pi
apie2
ap2ut2
a1pu
a1ph
ap2fa
ap1fe2
a1z
aza1
a1zo1
azi2n
a1zi
a3zu
a2fa
a3far
af1an
af1re
af2tau
af1ta
af3fe
affen3de
affe2n2d
a2q
a1x
ra1ro
2r1ar1b
rarbei3te
rar1bei
1rar1c
2r1art
rarti3gen
rar1ti
r1arm
rar1mt
r1a2rz
1ra1o
rann3ten
r1an1ga
r3anker
ran1ke
ran1stal3
ran1st
rans1p2
r1an1zu
r1a2nf
ra1be
r1a2b1w
ra2den
ra1de
ra1le1x
ra2lie
ra1li
rali3er
r1alt
1ral1w
1ralf
1ra1ly
r1aug
rausar1bei3
rau1sa
rau2s1ar
raus1ar1b
rau2m
2r1auf1d
2r1auff
ra1gr
r3a1ge2nt
ra1ge
rags2pr
rags1p2
rag3ter
rach3ter
ra1ha
r1ahn
rah1le
rah2l2e.
1rahm
rake1t
ra1ke
ra1kl
ra1ku
r1ak1k
rak3ter
rak3ten
ra1sa
ra3sche
r1amt
ra1pr
ra2phe
ra1ph
1ra1z
raf1te
r1ra
rra3ten
r1ro
r2ro1b
rro1bo1
r1rä
r1re
rrei3chen
r2rem
r2rep
r1ri
rrin1n
r1ru
rr2ut1
rr1c
r1rü
rrü1b
rr1tu
r1rö
r1r2y
ro1a
ro1re
ro1ri
roris3ti3
ror1t
r2on
ro1no1
ro1ne
ro2nes
roni3st
ro1ni
ro1nis
ron1s
ro1b
ro1i
rol1le
1rou
ro1ch
ro2hes
ro1he
ro3se
ro1sk
ro1s1w
ro1men
rom3me
ro1pe
ropf3te
ro2ß
ro3ß1er
ro1ße
roß3e2n.
ro2ß1em
r1na
rnan1t
r2n1ab
rna1li4
rna1lis4t
r2n1au
rnatio1na3
r1na1ti
rnati1o
rnation2
rnrei2
rn1r
r1no
rn1ost
r1nä
rnäch1
rn1do
r2nd
rn2der
r1nerf
r1nen
rnel1
rneh3mer.
r1neh
r2nes
r1ni
rnied1ri3
r1nu
rn1g
rn1c
r1nü
rn2kä
rns2
rns4t
rn1str2
rns3te3re
rn1sp2
rn3ta
rn1tes1
rn1tem
rnwe1r
rn1w
r1b
r3brü4
rbe2la3
rbe3st
r2bli4
r3blie
rbslo3
r2bs
rbs1l
rb2st
rbs1te
rä2rz1
3r2ä2n.
3r2ä1ni
1räl
räu4s
räußerli3
r1äuß
räu1ße
räu3ßer
räußer1l
rä2c
rächti3gt
räch1ti
rä1ten
räfti3gen
räf1ti
rda1te
r1da
r1dr
rd1ran
rdrei3s
rdrü1
r1do
r1de
rde3rer
r1der
rd3erge
r3der1g
r3du
rd1st
r2d1t
re1an
rer1a
1rer2n.
re1rer
2rer1g
2r1erk
1rer1se
r3erst
rer3ste
r1er1w
4r1e2rz
2r1erf
1re1o
3rena
1ren1b
1ren4d.
re2nd
ren3d2e.
re1ni
1ren1l
renge3re
ren3ge
ren1ger
1ren1h
1renk
1re2ns
rent1h
re2nt
r1en2t1s
r3ent1w
1ren1m
1ren1p2
1re2n3f
1ren1j
reb2
reb3ten
re2bt
1re1da
1re3de
re2d2t
re1el
r1ein1r
reinba3re
rein1b
rein1ba
rei1ni1
reini4gt2e.
rei1nig
reinheitli3
rein1h
reinhei2t1l
rei3d
reichs3
reisen3
rei1se
rei3sc
rei1ta
rei1te
rei4t2e.
reite3re
rei1ter
rei4tes3
rei2tem
rei3men
rei2z2e.
rei1ze
re1le
rel3ler
2r1eur
re2u2t
1reg
rech4te2n.
rech3ten
reck3te
rec2k
r1eh2e.
re1he
1rek
2re2s.
res1a
resen1
re1se
2res1q
r2e1te
re2t2e.
reten2
re2tes
re1v
re1po
1re1z
1re1fe
1re1fl
ri3an
ri1a
ri2as
2r1ir
rin3n2e.
r3in1ner
2ri2nd
rin1du1
ri2ne
r1inst
rin2zen
rin1ze
ri1de
ri3e3r2e.
rie1re
3rier3tes1
rie2rte
3rier3tem
ri1en1h
ri1e2nt
rie3de
ri1el
riel3le
rie2g2e.
rie1ge
rie1s
2rief
ri4g1k
ri1gt
ri1che
richti3gt
rich1ti
ri2ck2e.
ric2k
ri1cke
rick3te
1rih
rikan3te
ri1ka
ri1ki
ri3s4tik
ri3sti2s2ch.
ristis4ch
ri3stisch2e.
ris3ti3scher
ris3ti3schen
ris3ti3sches
ri1ta
ri1me
ri1ph
ri2fe
r2if
r1l
rlau4b
rlah1
rlo1gi1
rl2o1g
rlo3s2t
r2l2e.
rlie2d
rli3cht
rli3ste
r1list
r2l1c
r2l2s1
rlö1sc
rlö3st
ru1a
rur1
run2d1a
ru2nd
run2d3er
run1de
2r1un1s
4runter1l
run1t
r3unters
ru2bi
ru1i
ruch3te
ru1str2
ru1ta
r2ut
ru1te
rut1h
1ruf
ru2f2e.
ru1fe
ruf2st
r1g
r2g1ar1b
r1ga
rgan4g
rgan3ge3nen
rgan1ge
rgan1gene
r2g1au
r2g1no
r3ger
rgen3st
r1ge2ns
r2ge1do
r1ge3d
rgewal1ti3
r1ge1w
rgefal1le3ne
r1gef
rge1fa
rgefal1le
r2gin
r1gi
rg1lo
rg1li
r2gs
rg1sk
r2gt
r1ca
rch1au
r1chen
r2ch1ei2
rche1s
r2ch1l
rch1st
rch1tu
r2ch3m
r1h
r2hans
rha1sc
rhaf4te
rhobe3ne
rho1b
rho2l2e.
rho1le
rherrli3
rherr1l
rhei1li3
rheimli3
rheim1l
rhöch1
1r2hy
rü3ber.
rübe2
rüber1
r3übers
rü1ben
rü1b1l
rück1zah3
rüc2k
rück1z
rühren4
rüh1re
rüte1t2
rü1te
rüttel3te
rüt1te
rüt3tel
rü1me
rka4s
r1ka
r1kn
r1ke
r2k2e.
rk2e1te
r1ki
rkin2
r1kla
rk1lic
r1ku
rkun1di3
rku2nd
rküh1
r1kü
rk1sh
rk1str2
rk1ten
r1sa
rs1ang
rsa1li1
rs3acht
r2ser.
r1se
rse2n1d
r3sel
rs3eh2e.
rse1he
rs1ep
r3si
rsiche3re2
rsi1che
rsi3ve2r1
r1sc
r3sche
rsch3lun
rs2chl
rsch2lu
rsch3te
r2scht
r1sü
rsün1di3
rsü2nd
r2s1s
rs1si1
r1sta
r1str2
rstrei3
rständi3gen
r1stä
rstä2nd
rstän1di
r3ster
rste3re
r1stes
r1sti
r3stu
r1s2p2
r1sy1
r1ta
r2t1ar
rta1ne
r2t1a2b1s
rta2g2e.
r1tag
rta1ge
r1tr2
r1to
r1to2d
r1tä
rtäu1
2rte
r1tea
rter2r
r1tern
r1tena
r1te2nd
r1ten1k
r1te2ns
r1ten1m
r1ten1p2
r1tenz
r1teb
r1tei
rt1ein
r1tel
r1tec
r1te2t2
r1ti
rtig3te
rti1m
rt1urt
r1tum
r1thr
r2t1hei
r2t1hi
r1tü
rtü1me
rt1sc
r2ts
rt1str2
rt1tr2
rt1z
r1tö
rm1a1na
r1ma
rma1ne
rma1li1
r3mal
r3mac
r3mak
rma2te
rmati3ven
rma1ti
rmo1der2
r1mo
r3mo1d
r1mä
rmächti3gt
rmäch1ti
rmäßi3ge
r1mäß
rmä1ßi
r1mer
rme1di1
r1med
r1mel
r2mel1te
rmi1nis3
r1mi
rmi1ni
rministi3
rmis4ch4
rmu2t2e.
r1mu
rmu1te
rm2ut
rmu3ti1
rm1ga1
rm1g
r1mü
rmüti3ge
r1müt
rmü1ti
rm1sp2
rmögli3
r1mö
rmög1l
r1v
rva1
rvati3v2e.
rva1ti
rvati3ve2r1
r1w
rwachse3ne
rwach1se
rwer4b
rwe2r3te
rwirkli3che
rwirk1l
rwirk1lic
r1wu1c
r1p2
rpach1
rprei2
r2ps
rp3fa
2rz
rz1ar2
rzah3le
r1zah
r1zo1
r2z1eng
r1ze
rzei3te
r3zei
r2z1in
r1zi
rziehen3
rzie1he
r1zwi
r1fr
rfri1
rfo1ru
r1fo
rfor3me
rfol4g2e.
rfol1ge
rfe1ri1
r1fe
rfer1ti3
rfech1
rfi1na1
r1fi
r1fl
rf2lie1
r2f1lic
rflüs1si3
rflü2ss
rf1lö
r3fu
rf1te
r1ör1
rö1g
rö1c
r1ö3k
rö1st
r1öf
röffentli3
röf1fe
